Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 1. General Provisions

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 4, provides: “The provisions of this act shall apply to all projects commenced on or after July 1, 2011.
Any projects commenced prior to July 1, 2011, shall be governed by the lien procedures in title 29 that existed prior to July 1, 2011.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part V, § 6, related to lien of state on realty of debtor.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 6, § 8, related to lien of attorneys on papers and monies of clients.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-103.
Short title.

W.S.

29-1-103

through

29-10-106

shall be known and may be cited as the “Revised Wyoming Statutory Lien Act”.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

§ 29-1-104.
Other lien statutes and legal processes not affected by this act.

Unless other statutes relating to liens specifically provide that the procedures specified in chapter 1, 2, 9 or 10 of this act apply, this act is supplemental to and does not supersede any other lien statutes contained in chapters 3 through 8 of this act nor other lien statutes nor other statutes relating in any way to liens currently existing related to other types of property or other subject matters.

Nothing in this act shall affect or abridge:

A right of setoff;

The right to file legal action based on equitable principles, including unjust enrichment, quantum meruit and other equitable doctrines; or

The right to enforce a lien otherwise created by contract.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Stated

in

Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb 19, 2014).